Maryland, session 2025, HB0492.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Procedure
10–232.2.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “CENTRAL REPOSITORY” MEANS THE CRIMINAL
JUSTICE INFORMATION SYSTEM CENTRAL REPOSITORY OF THE DEPARTMENT OF
PUBLIC SAFETY AND CORRECTIONAL SERVICES.
(B) THE DIRECTOR OF HUMAN RESOURCES OF FREDERICK COUNTY MAY
REQUEST FROM THE CENTRAL REPOSITORY A STATE AND NATIONAL CRIMINAL
HISTORY RECORDS CHECK FOR A PROSPECTIVE OR CURRENT EMPLOYEE OR
VOLUNTEER OF FREDERICK COUNTY.
(C) (1) AS PART OF THE APPLICATION FOR A CRIMINAL HISTORY
RECORDS CHECK, THE DIRECTOR OF HUMAN RESOURCES OF FREDERICK COUNTY
SHALL SUBMIT TO THE CENTRAL REPOSITORY:
– 1 –

Ch. 149 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(I) TWO COMPLETE SETS OF THE PROSPECTIVE OR CURRENT
EMPLOYEE’S OR VOLUNTEER’S LEGIBLE FINGERPRINTS TAKEN ON FORMS
APPROVED BY THE DIRECTOR OF THE CENTRAL REPOSITORY AND THE DIRECTOR
OF THE FEDERAL BUREAU OF INVESTIGATION;
(II) THE FEE AUTHORIZED UNDER § 10–221(B)(7) OF THIS
SUBTITLE FOR ACCESS TO MARYLAND CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS; AND
(III) THE MANDATORY PROCESSING FEE REQUIRED BY THE
FEDERAL BUREAU OF INVESTIGATION FOR A NATIONAL CRIMINAL HISTORY
RECORDS CHECK.
(2) IN ACCORDANCE WITH §§ 10–201 THROUGH 10–250 OF THIS
SUBTITLE, THE CENTRAL REPOSITORY SHALL FORWARD TO THE PROSPECTIVE OR
CURRENT EMPLOYEE OR VOLUNTEER AND THE DIRECTOR OF HUMAN RESOURCES
OF FREDERICK COUNTY THE PROSPECTIVE OR CURRENT EMPLOYEE’S OR
VOLUNTEER’S CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD INFORMATION.
(3) INFORMATION OBTAINED FROM THE CENTRAL REPOSITORY
UNDER THIS SECTION:
(I) IS CONFIDENTIAL AND MAY NOT BE REDISSEMINATED; AND
(II) MAY BE USED ONLY FOR A PERSONNEL–RELATED PURPOSE
CONCERNING THE PROSPECTIVE OR CURRENT EMPLOYEE OR VOLUNTEER OF THE
COUNTY AS AUTHORIZED BY THIS SECTION.
(4) THE SUBJECT OF A CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS CHECK UNDER
THIS SECTION MAY CONTEST THE CONTENTS OF THE PRINTED STATEMENT ISSUED
BY THE CENTRAL REPOSITORY AS PROVIDED IN § 10–223 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(D) THE GOVERNING BODY OF FREDERICK COUNTY SHALL ADOPT
GUIDELINES TO CARRY OUT THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, April 22, 2025.
– 2 –